Hawaii statutes.
[PART V.]
WHISTLEBLOWERS' PROTECTION ACT

Revision Note

In this part, "part" substituted for
"chapter" pursuant to §23G-15.

Law Journals and Reviews

Wrongful Termination Law in Hawaii. V HBJ, no. 13, at 71
(2001).

Employee Rights Under Judicial Scrutiny: Prevalent Policy
Discourse and the Hawai‘i Supreme Court. 14 UH L. Rev. 189 (1992).

Confidentiality Breeds Contempt: A First Amendment Challenge
to Confidential Ethics Commission Proceedings of the City & County of
Honolulu. 18 UH L. Rev. 797 (1996).

Case Notes

Respondent's claims for discharge in violation of public
policy and in violation of the Hawaii Whistleblower [sic] Protection Act were
not preempted by the Railway Labor Act. 512 U.S. 246 (1994).

Plaintiff's Hawaii Whistleblowers' Protection Act and Parnar
v. Americana Hotels, Inc. claims were preempted by §1305(a)(1) of Airline
Deregulation Act of 1978. 870 F. Supp. 295 (1994).

The Act does not provide employees with a protected property
interest, as it does not create an enforceable expectation of continued public
employment. 120 F. Supp. 2d 1244 (2000).

Plaintiff could not maintain the present action where
plaintiff had agreed to "forever release, acquit, and discharge" the
claims in the mutual release and settlement agreement in plaintiff's first
action. 686 F. Supp. 2d 1079 (2010).

Portions of plaintiff's Whistleblowers' Protection Act claims
based on the alleged sexual orientation statements and the complaint and
investigation regarding plaintiff's alleged discrimination against two
individuals were time-barred. 892 F. Supp. 2d 1245 (2012).

Protection afforded under this Act not restricted to at-will
employees. 74 H. 235, 842 P.2d 634 (1992).

Where plaintiff was removed from project, State did not
violate the Act or the First Amendment to the U.S. Constitution when it
reassigned the project to someone else. 76 H. 332, 876 P.2d 1300 (1994).

A. General
Provisions

Note

Sections 378-61 to 378-69 designated as Subpart A by L 2011,
c 166, §3.

§378-61 Definitions. As used in this
part:

"Employee" means a person who
performs a service for wages or other remuneration under a contract for hire,
written or oral, express or implied. Employee includes a person employed by
the State or a political subdivision of the State.

"Employer" means a person who has one
or more employees. Employer includes an agent of an employer or of the State
or a political subdivision of the State.

"Person" means an individual, sole
proprietorship, partnership, corporation, association, or any other legal
entity.

"Public body" means:

(1) A state officer, employee, agency, department,
division, bureau, board, commission, committee, council, authority, or other
body in the executive branch of state government;

(2) An agency, board, commission, committee, council,
member, or employee of the legislative branch of the state government;

(3) A county, city, intercounty, intercity, or
regional governing body, a council, special district, or municipal corporation,
or a board, department, commission, committee, council, agency, or any member
or employee thereof;

(4) Any other body which is created by state or local
authority or which is primarily funded by or through state or local authority,
or any member or employee of that body;

(5) A law enforcement agency or any member or
employee of a law enforcement agency; or

(6) The judiciary and any member or employee of the
judiciary.

"Public employee" means any employee
of the State or any county, or the political subdivision and agencies of the
State or any county, any employee under contract with the State or any county,
any civil service employee, any probationary or provisional employee of the
State or county, and any employee of any general contractor or subcontractor
undertaking the execution of a contract with a governmental contracting agency,
as defined in section 104-1.

"Public employer" means the State and
any county, the political subdivisions and agencies of the State and any
county, and any general contractor or subcontractor undertaking the execution
of a contract with a governmental contracting agency, as defined in section
104-1, and includes any agent thereof. [L 1987, c 267, pt of §1; am L
2011, c 166, §5]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next